Utah statutes.
13-32a-104.5.   Database information from coin dealers -- New and prior customers.

(1)  A coin dealer shall maintain in a register and provide for the database the information under this section for each transaction of a coin or precious metal with a person with whom the coin dealer has not previously conducted a transaction.

(2)  For transactions under Subsection (1), the coin dealer or the coin dealer's employee shall enter the following information in the register regarding every coin or precious metal transaction:

(a)  the date and time of the transaction;

(b)  the receipt number;

(c)  the following information regarding the person who sells the coin or precious metal:

(i)  the person's name, residence address, and date of birth;

(ii)  the number of the driver license or other form of positive identification presented by the person, and notations of discrepancies if the person's physical description, including gender, height, weight, race, age, hair color, and eye color, does not correspond with identification provided by the person;

(iii)  the person's signature; and

(iv)  a legible fingerprint of the person's right thumb, or if the right thumb cannot be fingerprinted, a legible fingerprint of the person with a written notation identifying the fingerprint and the reason why the thumb print was unavailable;

(d)  the amount paid for the article, or the article for which it was traded;

(e)  the identification of the coin dealer or the employee who is conducting the transaction; and

(f)  an accurate description of the coin or precious metal, including available identifying marks such as:

(i)  type and name of coin or type and content of precious metal;

(ii)  metallic composition, and any jewels, stones, or glass;

(iii)  any other marks of identification or indicia of ownership on the article;

(iv)  the weight of the article, if the payment is based on weight;

(v)  any other unique identifying feature; and

(vi)  metallic content.

(3)  If multiple coins or precious metals in an amount that would make reporting of each item unreasonably difficult are part of a single sale transaction, a general description of the items and a photograph of the items, which shall be stored by the coin dealer with a copy of the invoice of the transaction for three years from the date of the transaction.

(4)  If the person selling a coin or precious metal to the coin dealer has an established previous transaction history with the coin dealer, the coin dealer or the coin dealer's employee shall enter the following information in the register:

(a)  the date and time of the transaction;

(b)  indication that the coin dealer has conducted business with the seller previously;

(c)  the identification of the coin dealer or the employee who is conducting the transaction;

(d)  the initials of the seller's legal name, including any middle name;

(e)  form of identification presented by the seller at the time of sale;

(f)  the last four digits of the unique identifying number on the form of identification; and

(g)  the identifying information under Subsection (2)(f) and under Subsection (3) as applicable.

(5)  A coin dealer may not accept any coin or precious metal if, upon inspection, it is apparent that serial numbers or identifying characteristics have been intentionally defaced on that coin or precious metal.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 2009 General Session

